Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2750.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 HF 2750 (3) 91 nls/ko/md H.F. 2750 DIVISION I 1 WIRE TRANSMISSION FEES 2 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 533C.1004 Wire transmission fees. 3 1. For purposes of this section, âwire transmissionâ means 4 money transmission by wire to or from locations abroad. 5 2. In addition to any other fee required by law for a wire 6 transmission, a licensee or the licenseeâs authorized delegate 7 shall collect from a customer a fee of five dollars for each 8 wire transmission equal to or less than five hundred dollars, 9 and in addition to such fee, if applicable, an amount equal to 10 two percent of the amount of the wire transmission in excess 11 of five hundred dollars. 12 3. The fees collected under subsection 2 shall be remitted 13 quarterly by the licensee or the licenseeâs authorized 14 delegate to the department of revenue in the form and manner 15 prescribed by the department of revenue, in consultation with 16 the department of public safety. All required forms and 17 remittances shall be filed with the department of revenue no 18 later than the fifteenth day of the month following the close 19 of each calendar quarter. 20 4. The department of revenue shall account for all fees 21 remitted under subsection 3 and distribute as follows: 22 a. Ten percent for allocation to the office to combat human 23 trafficking established in section 80.45. 24 b. Twenty percent for deposit in the school security grant 25 program fund established in section 256.20. 26 c. Seventy percent for deposit in the new prison 27 infrastructure account of the Iowa prison infrastructure fund 28 created in section 602.8108A. 29 d. The remainder, if any, for deposit in the general fund 30 of the state. 31 5. a. The department of revenue, in consultation with the 32 department of public safety, shall enforce the provisions of 33 this section. 34 b. If a licensee or licenseeâs authorized delegate fails 35 -1- HF 2750 (3) 91 nls/ko/md 1/ 3 H.F. 2750 to comply with subsection 3, the department of revenue shall 1 notify the superintendent who may suspend or revoke the 2 licenseeâs license under section 533C.901, and may issue an 3 order suspending or revoking the designation of an authorized 4 delegate under section 533C.902. Notification of a suspension 5 under this paragraph shall be delivered to the commissioner of 6 public safety. 7 c. Upon request by the department of revenue, the 8 superintendent may file a claim against the surety bond of the 9 licensee on behalf of the state. 10 Sec. 2. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. The following takes 11 effect July 1, 2026, if 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2753, is 12 enacted: 13 The portion of this division of this Act enacting section 14 533C.1004, subsection 4, paragraph âcâ. 15 DIVISION II 16 SCHOOL SECURITY GRANT PROGRAM 17 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 256.20 School security ââ grant 18 program. 19 1. The department shall establish a school security 20 grant program to provide grants to school districts to help 21 school districts offset the costs associated with any of the 22 following: 23 a. Installing school safety and security infrastructure, 24 including any of the following: 25 (1) Security camera systems. 26 (2) Metal detectors. 27 (3) Radios. 28 (4) Security doors and security windows that can withstand 29 breaching, bullets, and explosive blasts. 30 b. Employing, or retaining the services of, a school 31 resource officer or safety consultant. 32 2. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 33 to administer this section, including rules relating to grant 34 application materials, eligibility requirements, and award 35 -2- HF 2750 (3) 91 nls/ko/md 2/ 3 H.F. 2750 criteria. 1 3. Moneys awarded under this section shall be used to 2 supplement, not supplant, existing public funding used by a 3 school district for similar purposes. 4 4. A school security grant program fund is established 5 in the state treasury. The fund shall be administered by 6 and under the control of the department and shall consist of 7 moneys appropriated by the general assembly and any other 8 moneys received by the department for deposit in the fund. 9 The moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department for 10 the school security grant program. Notwithstanding section 11 8.33, moneys in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall 12 not revert to the general fund of the state but shall remain 13 available for expenditure for the school security grant program 14 for subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, 15 subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall 16 be credited to the fund. 17 5. For purposes of this section, âschool resource officerâ 18 means the same as defined in 34 U.S.C. Â§10389. âSchool resource 19 officerâ includes all of the following: 20 a. A peace officer as defined in section 801.4. 21 b. A reserve peace officer as defined in section 80D.1A. 22 -3- HF 2750 (3) 91 nls/ko/md 3/ 3